Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-517
School activities pass; volunteer, defined.

For purposes of section 79-518, volunteer means a person who is not an elected or appointed official or employee of a school district who, at the request or with the permission of the school board or board of education of the school district, engages in activities related to the purposes and functions of the school district or for its general benefit.

Laws 1994, LB 1310, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,246;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 270.